Virginia statutes. Title 8.1A. Uniform Commercial Code — General Provisions.
PART 1. General Provisions.

§ 8.1A-101.
Short titles.

Titles 8.1

A through 8.9A may be cited as the Uniform Commercial Code.

This title may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code — General Provisions.

History.

1964, c. 219, §

8.1-101

; 2003, c. 353.

Law Review.

For article, “Why the Commercial Code Should be ‘Uniform’,” see 20 W. & L. Law Rev. 237 (1963).

For note, “Effect of the Uniform Commercial Code on Virginia Law,” see 20 W. & L. Law Rev. 267 (1963).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1968-1969, see 55 Va. L. Rev. 1372 (1969).

for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1183 (1972).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

For article on the effect of delay on a surety’s obligations in Virginia, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 781 (1984).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1989-1990, see 24 U. Rich. L. Rev. 551 (1990).

For a note, “Is the Statute of Frauds Ready for Electronic Contracting?” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1447 (1999).

Research References.

Forms and Procedures Under the UCC (Matthew Bender). Hart.

UCC Reporter-Digest (Matthew Bender). Willier and Hart.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 8A-201 Variation from Uniform Commercial Code by Agreement.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 2.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Health care provider not liable on a products liability theory. —

There was nothing in the Uniform Commercial Code as adopted by Virginia, or the Medical Malpractice Act, §

8.01-581.1

, which stated that supplying a patient with a device for a fee was not a sale and that a health care provider could not be liable on a products liability theory under such circumstances; and had the General Assembly intended health care providers to be treated as “merchants,” such a provision would have been covered in the Medical Malpractice Act, but was not. Therefore the health care company was not a “seller” and was not subject to liability on a products liability theory in the patient’s action because health care providers render a service to their patients, and the transfer of any type of device to the patient during treatment is merely incidental to that treatment. Coffman v. Arthrex, Inc., 69 Va. Cir. 17, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 143 (Augusta County Mar. 31, 2005).

§ 8.1A-102.
Scope of title.

This title applies to a transaction to the extent that it is governed by another title of the Uniform Commercial Code.

History.

2003, c. 353.

§ 8.1A-103.
Construction of Uniform Commercial Code to promote its purposes and policies; applicability of supplemental principles of law.

The Uniform Commercial Code shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies, which are:

to simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing commercial transactions;

to permit the continued expansion of commercial practices through custom, usage, and agreement of the parties; and

to make uniform the law among the various jurisdictions.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, and other validating or invalidating cause supplement its provisions.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-549, 13-183, 13.1-418, 61-2; 1956, c. 428; 1964, c. 219, §§ 8.1-102, 8.1-103; 2003, c. 353.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 6, 8-10, 20, 25, 34,36,95, 99, 100.

§ 8.1A-104.
Construction against implied repeal.

The Uniform Commercial Code being a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, no part of it shall be deemed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if such construction can reasonably be avoided.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.1-104; 2003, c. 353.

Law Review.

For comment on cumulative remedies under article 9 of the U.C.C., see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 213 (1972).

§ 8.1A-105.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Cross references.

Former §

8.1A-105

, pertaining to severability, derived from 1964, c. 219, § 8.1-108; 2003, c. 353.

§ 8.1A-106.
Use of singular and plural; gender.

In the Uniform Commercial Code, unless the statutory context otherwise requires:

words in the singular number include the plural, and those in the plural include the singular; and

words of any gender also refer to any other gender.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.1-102; 2003, c. 353.

§ 8.1A-107.
Section captions.

Section captions are part of the Uniform Commercial Code.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.1-109; 2003, c. 353.

§ 8.1A-108.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This title modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., except that nothing in this title modifies, limits, or supersedes § 7001(c) of that Act or authorizes electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 7003(b) of that Act.

History.

2003, c. 353.